District of Columbia statutes.
31-2931

Coverage.

(a)

Every individual and group health insurance policy or service, including Medicaid, shall provide coverage for colorectal cancer screening for policyholders residing in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The screening shall be in compliance with American Cancer Society colorectal cancer screening guidelines.

(c)

As American Cancer Society colorectal cancer screening guidelines are updated, every individual and group health insurance policy of service, including Medicaid, shall update their colorectal cancer screening benefits to comply with the American Cancer Society guidelines.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-100, § 2, 49 DCR 1008